Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
Sex Offender Registration
17.568.
Injunctive relief.

Whenever in the judgment of the board any person has engaged or is about to engage in any acts or practices that constitute or will constitute a violation of KRS

17.500

to

17.580

and

17.991

, the board may apply to the Franklin Circuit Court for an order enjoining these acts or practices.

Upon a showing by the board that a person has engaged or is about to engage in any of these acts or practices, an injunction, restraining order, or other order as may be appropriate shall be granted by the court.

Any order of the Franklin Circuit Court shall be enforceable and shall be valid anywhere in this state, and the order of the court shall be reviewable as provided in the Rules of Civil Procedure in the case of other injunctions and restraining orders.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 606, § 149, effective July 15, 1998; 2006, ch. 182, § 11, effective July 12, 2006.

17.570.
Order for sex offender risk assessment — Cost — Hearing — Appeal — Notice to sheriff upon release of sex offender. [Repealed.]

17.572.
Notification for high, moderate, and low risk sex offenders. [Repealed.]

17.574.
Forwarding of relevant information by certain facilities to approved provider for review prior to release — Confidentiality.

Any statutes to the contrary notwithstanding, all state or local detention or correctional facilities, hospitals, or institutions shall forward all relevant information pertaining to a sexual offender to be discharged, paroled, or released to the approved provider for review prior to the release or discharge for consideration in making recommendations to the sentencing court. The relevant information shall include but is not limited to:

The institutional record;

The medical record including all psychological records; and

The treatment record.

All confidential records provided pursuant to this section shall remain confidential, unless otherwise ordered by a court or by another person duly authorized to release the information.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 606, § 152, effective January 15, 1999; 2000, ch. 401, § 26, effective April 11, 2000; 2006, ch. 182, § 12, effective July 12, 2006.

17.576.
Privileged communications — Written waiver.

Communications made in the course of comprehensive sex offender presentence evaluations or treatment to the approved provider and any employee of the approved provider who is assigned to assist in the assessments shall be privileged from disclosure in any civil or criminal proceeding, other than to determine sentence, unless the offender consents in writing to the disclosure or the communication is related to an ongoing criminal investigation. The sexual offender shall be informed in writing of the limits of the privilege created in this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 606, § 153, effective January 15, 1999; 2000, ch. 401, § 27, effective April 11, 2000.

17.578.
Termination of duty to register.

A person required to register under the provisions of KRS

17.510

and

17.520

shall be relieved of any further duty to register only upon reversal of the underlying conviction or upon a pardon.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 606, § 154, effective January 15, 1999; 2000, ch. 401, § 28, effective April 11, 2000.

17.580.
Duty of Department of Kentucky State Police to maintain and update Web site containing information about adults who have committed sex crimes or crimes against minors — Immunity from liability for good faith dissemination of information — Justice and Public Safety Cabinet to establish toll-free telephone number — Permission for local law enforcement agency to notify of registrants in jurisdiction.

The Department of Kentucky State Police shall establish a Web site available to the public. The Web site shall display:

The registrant information, except for information that identifies a victim, DNA samples, fingerprints, palm prints, Social Security numbers, motor vehicle operator’s license numbers, and government-issued identification card numbers obtained by the Information Services Center, Department of Kentucky State Police, under KRS

17.510

;

The sex offender information, except for information that identifies a victim, DNA samples, Social Security numbers, and vehicle registration data, obtained by the Information Services Center, Department of Kentucky State Police, under KRS

17.510

prior to April 11, 2000; and

The registrant’s conviction, the elements of the offense for which the registrant was convicted, whether the registrant is currently on probation or parole, and whether the registrant is compliant or noncompliant.

The Web site shall be updated every day except for Saturdays, Sundays, and state holidays.

The information pertaining to an individual shall be maintained on the Web site so long as that individual is registered in accordance with KRS

17.500

to

17.580

.

The following language shall be prominently displayed on the Web site: “UNDER KRS

525.070

AND

525.080

, USE OF INFORMATION OBTAINED FROM THIS WEB SITE TO HARASS A PERSON IDENTIFIED ON THIS WEB SITE IS A CRIMINAL OFFENSE PUNISHABLE BY UP TO NINETY (90) DAYS IN THE COUNTY JAIL. MORE SEVERE CRIMINAL PENALTIES APPLY FOR MORE SEVERE CRIMES COMMITTED AGAINST A PERSON IDENTIFIED ON THIS WEB SITE.”

Any Department of Kentucky State Police employee who disseminates, or does not disseminate, registrant information or sex offender information in good-faith compliance with the requirements of this section shall be immune from criminal and civil liability for the dissemination or lack thereof.

Any person, including an employee of a sheriff’s office, acting in good faith in disseminating, or not disseminating, information previously disseminated by the Department of Kentucky State Police shall be immune from criminal and civil liability for the dissemination or lack thereof.

The cabinet shall establish a toll-free telephone number for a person to call to learn the identity of the Web site created in this section and the location of public access to the Web site in the county where the person resides.

In addition to the Web site, a local law enforcement agency may provide personal notification regarding the registrants located in its jurisdiction. Any notification shall contain the warning specified in subsection (3) of this section.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 401, §
19, effective April 11, 2000; 2006, ch. 182, §
13, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 85, §
103, effective June 26, 2007; 2008, ch. 158, §
14, effective July 1, 2008; repealed and reenact., Acts 2009, ch. 105, § 6, effective March 27, 2009; 2009, ch. 100, § 7, effective June 25, 2009; 2018 ch. 42, § 4, effective July 14, 2018; 2018 ch. 121, § 4, effective July 14, 2018.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/14/2018). This statute was amended by 2018 Ky. Acts chs. 42 and 121, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

(6/25/2009). A reference in subsection (7) of this statute to “subsection (3) of this section” has been changed in codification to “subsection (4) of this section” by the Reviser of Statutes under the authority of KRS 7.136(1) to reflect the addition of a new subsection and renumbering of succeeding subsections in 2009 Ky. Acts ch. 100, sec. 7.